Utah statutes.
11-14-406.   Application of chapter.
Sections 11-14-201, 11-14-202, 11-14-203, 11-14-204, 11-14-205, and 11-14-207
shall apply to all bond elections held by any local political subdivision and,
except as otherwise provided in Section 11-14-402, by any other taxing
district or governmental entity whether or not the bonds are issued under
authority granted by this chapter.
